Utah statutes.
16-10a-1701.   Application to existing domestic corporations.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 16-10a-1704, this chapter applies to
all domestic corporations in existence on July 1, 1992, that were incorporated
under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of
corporations for profit, and to actions taken by the directors, officers, and
shareholders of such corporations after July 1, 1992.
